Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-275.02
Conveyance by married persons to themselves prior to August 24, 1941, as joint tenants; limitation of action.

After September 7, 1948, no action may be maintained to set aside any deed of conveyance mentioned in section 76-275.01, which deed was executed and recorded prior to August 24, 1941, upon the ground that the grantor or grantors therein did not have the legal power and right to make a conveyance direct to such grantee and spouse or themselves in such manner.

Laws 1947, c. 248, § 2, p. 772.